Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 2, chapter 43, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) As used in this section  and section 3 of this 2025 Act :
(a) “Education provider” means:
(A) A school district as defined in ORS 332.002;
(B) An entity that is  a provider under the Oregon Prenatal to Kindergarten Program or other
public early learning and preschool programs established under ORS 329.172 to 329.200;
(C) The Oregon School for the Deaf;
(D) An education service district;
(E) An educational program under  the Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile
Detention Education Program, as those terms are defined in ORS 326.695; or
(F) A program that receives moneys pursuant to ORS 343.243.
(b) “Stop arm  camera” means a video recording device that is installed on a school bus for the
purpose of recording drivers who fail to stop for bus safety lights in  violation of ORS 811.155 and
that is capable of recording the date, time, registration plate number and location of the offense.
(2) Consistent with public contracting  law and applicable collective bargaining agreements, an
education provider , in agreement with a law enforcement agency,  may enter into a  contract
with a private entity for the installation, operation and maintenance of stop arm cameras on school
buses to photograph, by automated means, drivers who violate ORS 811.155. A  camera installed,
operated or maintained as provided by this subsection may not photograph the driver of a  school
bus while the  driver is on the school bus or the students of a school bus while the students are on
the school bus.
(3) When a stop arm camera is installed on a school bus:
(a) The education provider must inform, or cause to be  informed, persons who will drive, main-
tain or otherwise interact with the  school bus, as determined by the education provider, that a stop
arm camera is installed on the bus.
(b) Except as provided by agreement,  an education provider may not require or expect an em-
ployee to perform any job duties related to the installation, operation or maintenance of the  stop
arm camera.
(c) An education  provider may not require, as a condition of employment, that an employee
participate in the issuance of a citation for violation  of ORS 811.155, unless participation is required
Enrolled House Bill 2530 (HB 2530-A) Page 1
by law enforcement or for a judicial proceeding. Nothing in this paragraph prohibits  a driver of a
school bus from reporting a violation as allowed under ORS 811.157.
(d) A warning sign must be posted on  the school bus indicating the use of the stop arm camera.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, a law enforcement agency that has entered into
an agreement with an  education provider related to stop arm cameras on school buses may issue a
citation for violation of ORS 811.155 on the basis of photographs or video from a camera and  other
technology,  including  sensors that measure movement of a motor vehicle while a stop arm is de-
ployed without the presence of a police officer, if the following conditions are met:
(a) A police officer has reviewed the evidence and signs the citation.
(b) A rebuttable  presumption exists that a warning sign was posted as required under
subsection (3)(d) of this section and the bus safety lights  were operational and activated at
the time of the violation.
[(b)] (c)  The citation is mailed to the registered owner of the vehicle within 10 business  days
of the alleged violation.
[(c)] (d) The registered owner is given 30 days from the date the citation is  mailed to respond
to the citation.
[(d)] (e)  A rebuttable presumption exists that the registered owner of the vehicle was the driver
of the vehicle when the citation is issued and delivered as provided in this section.
[(e)] (f)  A driver issued a  citation under this subsection may respond to the citation by submit-
ting a certificate of innocence or a certificate of nonliability under subsection (6) of this section or
may make any other response allowed by law.
(5) A  citation may be delivered by mail or otherwise to the registered owner of the vehicle or
to the driver. The citation may be prepared on a digital  medium, and the signature may be elec-
tronic in accordance with the provisions of ORS 84.001 to 84.061.
(6)(a) A registered owner of a vehicle may respond by mail to a citation issued  under subsection
(4) of this section by submitting,  within 30 days after the mailing of the citation, a certificate of
innocence swearing or affirming that the  owner was not the driver of the vehicle and by providing
a photocopy of the owner’s driver license. A jurisdiction that receives  a certificate of innocence
under this paragraph shall dismiss  the citation without requiring a court appearance by the regis-
tered owner or any other information  from the registered owner other than the certificate of inno-
cence and the photocopy. The citation may be reissued only once, only to  the registered owner and
only if the jurisdiction  verifies that the registered owner appears to have been the driver at the time
of the violation. A registered owner may not submit a certificate of innocence  in response to a re-
issued citation.
(b) If a business or public agency responds to a citation issued under subsection (4) of this  sec-
tion by submitting, within 30 days after the mailing of  the citation, a certificate of nonliability
stating that at the time of the alleged violation the vehicle was in the custody and control of  an
employee, or was in the custody and control of a renter or lessee  under the terms of a rental
agreement or  lease, and if the business or public agency provides the driver license number, name
and address of the employee, renter or lessee,  the citation shall be dismissed with respect to the
business or public agency. The  citation may then be issued and delivered by mail or otherwise to
the employee, renter or lessee identified in the certificate of nonliability.
(7) If the person named  as the registered owner of a vehicle in the current records of the De-
partment of Transportation fails to respond to a citation issued under  subsection (4) of this section,
a default judgment under ORS 153.102 may be entered for failure to appear after notice has been
given that the judgment will be entered.
(8) The penalties for and all consequences of violating  ORS 811.155 initiated by the submission
of a report under  this section are the same as the penalties for and all consequences of violating
ORS 811.155 initiated by any other means.
(9) A registered owner, employee, renter or lessee against whom a judgment for failure to appear
is entered may move the court to relieve the owner, employee, renter or lessee from the judgment
Enrolled House Bill 2530 (HB 2530-A) Page 2
as provided in ORS 153.105 if the failure to appear was due to mistake, inadvertence, surprise  or
excusable neglect.
(10) An  image or video recording produced by a stop arm camera may not be used for any pur-
pose other than the investigation of a violation or a crime.
SECTION 2. Section 3 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of the Oregon Vehicle
Code.
SECTION 3. After a city or county receives moneys under ORS 153.633 or 153.640, as a
result of a conviction of failure to stop for bus safety lights, in violation of ORS 811.155,  the
city or county shall disburse all of the moneys to an education provider if:
(1) The citation was issued on the basis of evidence provided by a stop arm camera; and
(2) The education provider had the stop arm camera installed.
Passed by House April 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2530 (HB 2530-A) Page 3